Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-506
Guidelines for contracts.

The department shall adopt guidelines for entering into a design-build contract, a progressive design-build contract, or a construction manager-general contractor contract. The department's guidelines shall include the following:

(1) Preparation and content of requests for qualifications;

(2) Preparation and content of requests for proposals;

(3) Qualification and short-listing of design-builders, progressive design-builders, and construction managers. The guidelines shall provide that the department will evaluate prospective design-builders, progressive design-builders, and construction managers based on the information submitted to the department in response to a request for qualifications and will select a short list of design-builders, progressive design-builders, or construction managers who shall be considered qualified and eligible to respond to the request for proposals;

(4) Preparation and submittal of proposals;

(5) Procedures and standards for evaluating proposals;

(6) Procedures for negotiations between the department and the design-builders, progressive design-builders, or construction managers submitting proposals prior to the acceptance of a proposal if any such negotiations are contemplated; and

(7) Procedures for the evaluation of construction under a design-build contract or a progressive design-build contract to determine adherence to the project performance criteria.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 6.